Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-175
Salvage branded or manufacturer buyback branded certificate
of title; when issued; procedure.

Any person who acquires ownership
of a salvage or manufacturer buyback vehicle for which he or she does not
obtain a salvage branded or manufacturer buyback branded certificate of title
shall surrender the certificate of title to the county treasurer and make application
for a salvage branded or manufacturer buyback branded certificate of title
within thirty days after acquisition or prior to the sale or resale of the
vehicle or any major component part of such vehicle or use of any major component
part of the vehicle, whichever occurs earlier.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 75;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 47.